Florida, session 2026, HB1105.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
110
111 Section 1. Section 741.30, Florida Statutes, is amended to
112 read:
113 741.30 Domestic violence; injunction; powers and duties of
114 court and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary
115 injunction; issuance of injunction; Statewide Injunction
116 Verification System; enforcement; public records exemption.—
117 (1) There is created a cause of action for an injunction
118 for protection against domestic violence.
119 (a) Any person described in paragraph (e), who is either
120 the victim of domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28 or has
121 reasonable cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger of
122 becoming the victim of any act of domestic violence, has
123 standing in the circuit court to file a verified petition for an
124 injunction for protection against domestic violence.
125 (b) This cause of action for an injunction may be sought
Page 5 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
126 whether or not any other cause of action is currently pending
127 between the parties. However, the pendency of any such cause of
128 action shall be alleged in the petition.
129 (c) In the event a subsequent cause of action is filed
130 under chapter 61, any orders entered therein shall take
131 precedence over any inconsistent provisions of an injunction
132 issued under this section which addresses matters governed by
133 chapter 61.
134 (d) A person's right to petition for an injunction shall
135 not be affected by such person having left a residence or
136 household to avoid domestic violence.
137 (e) This cause of action for an injunction may be sought
138 by family or household members. No person shall be precluded
139 from seeking injunctive relief pursuant to this chapter solely
140 on the basis that such person is not a spouse.
141 (f) This cause of action for an injunction shall not
142 require that either party be represented by an attorney.
143 (g) Any person, including an officer of the court, who
144 offers evidence or recommendations relating to the cause of
145 action must either present the evidence or recommendations in
146 writing to the court with copies to each party and their
147 attorney, or must present the evidence under oath at a hearing
148 at which all parties are present.
149 (h) Nothing in this section shall affect the title to any
150 real estate.
Page 6 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
151 (i) The court is prohibited from issuing mutual orders of
152 protection. This does not preclude the court from issuing
153 separate injunctions for protection against domestic violence
154 where each party has complied with the provisions of this
155 section. Compliance with the provisions of this section cannot
156 be waived.
157 (j) Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 47, a
158 petition for an injunction for protection against domestic
159 violence may be filed in the circuit where the petitioner
160 currently or temporarily resides, where the respondent resides,
161 or where the domestic violence occurred. There is no minimum
162 requirement of residency to petition for an injunction for
163 protection.
164 (2)(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessment of a
165 filing fee for a petition for protection against domestic
166 violence is prohibited. However, subject to legislative
167 appropriation, the clerk of the circuit court may, on a
168 quarterly basis, submit to the Justice Administrative Commission
169 a certified request for reimbursement for petitions for
170 protection against domestic violence issued by the court, at the
171 rate of $40 per petition. The request for reimbursement must be
172 submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the Justice
173 Administrative Commission. From this reimbursement, the clerk
174 shall pay any law enforcement agency serving the injunction the
175 fee requested by the law enforcement agency; however, this fee
Page 7 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
176 may not exceed $20.
177 (b) No bond shall be required by the court for the entry
178 of an injunction.
179 (c)1. The clerk of the court shall assist petitioners in
180 seeking both injunctions for protection against domestic
181 violence and enforcement for a violation thereof as specified in
182 this section.
183 2. All clerks' offices shall provide simplified petition
184 forms for the injunction, any motion for modifications, any
185 motion for and the enforcement thereof, and a designation of
186 mailing and e-mail addresses for service, including instructions
187 for completion.
188 3. The clerk of the court shall advise petitioners of the
189 opportunity to apply for a certificate of indigence in lieu of
190 prepayment for the cost of the filing fee, as provided in
191 paragraph (a).
192 4. The clerk of the court shall ensure the petitioner's
193 privacy to the extent practical while completing the forms for
194 injunctions for protection against domestic violence.
195 5. The clerk of the court shall provide petitioners with a
196 minimum of two certified copies of the order of the temporary
197 injunction, one of which is serviceable and will inform the
198 petitioner of the process for service and enforcement.
199 6. Clerks of court and appropriate staff in each county
200 shall receive training in the effective assistance of
Page 8 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
201 petitioners as provided or approved by the Florida Association
202 of Court Clerks.
203 7. The clerk of the court in each county shall make
204 available informational brochures on domestic violence when such
205 brochures are provided by local certified domestic violence
206 centers.
207 8. The clerk of the court in each county shall distribute
208 a statewide uniform informational brochure to petitioners at the
209 time of filing for an injunction for protection against domestic
210 or repeat violence when such brochures become available. The
211 brochure must include information about the effect of giving the
212 court false information about domestic violence.
213 (3)(a) The verified petition must allege the existence of
214 such domestic violence and must include the specific facts and
215 circumstances upon the basis of which relief is sought.
216 (b) The verified petition shall be in substantially the
217 following form:
218
219 PETITION FOR
220 INJUNCTION FOR PROTECTION
221 AGAINST DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
222
223 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under penalties
224 of perjury that the following statements are true:
225 (a) Petitioner resides at: ...(address)...
Page 9 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
226 (Petitioner may furnish address to the court in a separate
227 confidential filing if, for safety reasons, the petitioner
228 requires the location of the current residence to be
229 confidential.)
230 (b) Respondent resides at: ...(last known address)...
231 (c) Respondent's last known place of employment: ...(name
232 of business and address)...
233 (d) Physical description of respondent:...............
234 Race........
235 Sex........
236 Date of birth........
237 Height........
238 Weight........
239 Eye color........
240 Hair color........
241 Distinguishing marks or scars........
242 (e) Aliases of respondent:............................
243 (f) Respondent is the spouse or former spouse of the
244 petitioner or is any other person related by blood or marriage
245 to the petitioner or is any other person who is or was residing
246 within a single dwelling unit with the petitioner, as if a
247 family, or is a person with whom the petitioner has a child in
248 common, regardless of whether the petitioner and respondent are
249 or were married or residing together, as if a family.
250 (g) The following describes any other cause of action
Page 10 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
251 currently pending between the petitioner and respondent:....
252
253 The petitioner should also describe any previous or pending
254 attempts by the petitioner to obtain an injunction for
255 protection against domestic violence in this or any other
256 circuit, and the results of that attempt:...................
257
258 Case numbers should be included if available.
259 (h) Petitioner is either a victim of domestic violence or
260 has reasonable cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger
261 of becoming a victim of domestic violence because respondent
262 has: ...(mark all sections that apply and describe in the spaces
263 below the incidents of violence or threats of violence,
264 specifying when and where they occurred, including, but not
265 limited to, locations such as a home, school, place of
266 employment, or visitation exchange)...
267 ................................................................
268 ................................................................
269 ....committed or threatened to commit domestic violence
270 defined in s. 741.28, Florida Statutes, as any assault,
271 aggravated assault, battery, aggravated battery, sexual assault,
272 sexual battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, kidnapping, false
273 imprisonment, or any criminal offense resulting in physical
274 injury or death of one family or household member by another.
275 With the exception of persons who are parents of a child in
Page 11 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
276 common, the family or household members must be currently
277 residing or have in the past resided together in the same single
278 dwelling unit.
279 ....previously threatened, harassed, stalked, or physically
280 abused the petitioner.
281 ....attempted to harm the petitioner or family members or
282 individuals closely associated with the petitioner.
283 ....threatened to conceal, kidnap, or harm the petitioner's
284 child or children.
285 ....intentionally injured or killed a family pet.
286 ....used, or has threatened to use, against the petitioner
287 any weapons such as guns or knives.
288 ....physically restrained the petitioner from leaving the
289 home or calling law enforcement.
290 ....a criminal history involving violence or the threat of
291 violence (if known).
292 ....another order of protection issued against him or her
293 previously or from another jurisdiction (if known).
294 ....destroyed personal property, including, but not limited
295 to, telephones or other communication equipment, clothing, or
296 other items belonging to the petitioner.
297 ....engaged in a pattern of abusive, threatening,
298 intimidating, or controlling behavior composed of a series of
299 acts over a period of time, however short.
300 ....engaged in any other behavior or conduct that leads the
Page 12 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
301 petitioner to have reasonable cause to believe he or she is in
302 imminent danger of becoming a victim of domestic violence.
303 (i) Petitioner alleges the following additional specific
304 facts: ...(mark appropriate sections)...
305 ....A minor child or minor children reside with the
306 petitioner whose names and ages are as follows:
307
308 ....Petitioner needs the exclusive use and possession of
309 the dwelling that the parties share.
310 ....Petitioner is unable to obtain safe alternative housing
311 because:
312
313 ....Petitioner genuinely fears that respondent imminently
314 will abuse, remove, or hide the minor child or children from
315 petitioner because:
316
317 (j) Petitioner genuinely fears imminent domestic violence
318 by respondent.
319 (k) Petitioner seeks an injunction: ...(mark appropriate
320 section or sections)...
321 ....Immediately restraining the respondent from committing
322 any acts of domestic violence.
323 ....Restraining the respondent from committing any acts of
324 domestic violence.
325 ....Awarding to the petitioner the temporary exclusive use
Page 13 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
326 and possession of the dwelling that the parties share or
327 excluding the respondent from the residence of the petitioner.
328 ....Providing a temporary parenting plan, including a
329 temporary time-sharing schedule, with regard to the minor child
330 or children of the parties which might involve prohibiting or
331 limiting time-sharing or requiring that it be supervised by a
332 third party.
333 ....Designating that the exchange of the minor child or
334 children of the parties must occur at a neutral safe exchange
335 location as provided in s. 125.01(8) or a location authorized by
336 a supervised visitation program as defined in s. 753.01 if
337 temporary time-sharing of the child is awarded to the
338 respondent.
339 ....Establishing temporary support for the minor child or
340 children or the petitioner.
341 ....Directing the respondent to participate in a batterers'
342 intervention program.
343 ....Providing any terms the court deems necessary for the
344 protection of a victim of domestic violence, or any minor
345 children of the victim, including any injunctions or directives
346 to law enforcement agencies.
347
348 (c) Every petition for an injunction against domestic
349 violence must contain, directly above the signature line, a
350 statement in all capital letters and bold type not smaller than
Page 14 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
351 the surrounding text, as follows:
352
353 UNDER PENALTIES OF PERJURY, I DECLARE THAT I HAVE READ
354 THE FOREGOING DOCUMENT AND THAT THE FACTS STATED IN IT
355 ARE TRUE. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE STATEMENTS MADE IN
356 THIS PETITION ARE BEING MADE UNDER PENALTIES OF
357 PERJURY, PUNISHABLE AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 92.525,
358 FLORIDA STATUTES.
359
360 ...(initials)...
361
362 (d) If the verified petition seeks to determine a
363 parenting plan and time-sharing schedule with regard to the
364 minor child or children of the parties, the verified petition
365 must be accompanied by or must incorporate the allegations
366 required by s. 61.522 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction
367 and Enforcement Act.
368 (4) Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall
369 review the petition ex parte. The court must set a final hearing
370 to be held at the earliest possible time if it appears the
371 petitioner is a victim of domestic violence or has reasonable
372 cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a
373 victim of domestic violence. If a final hearing is set, the
374 respondent must shall be personally served by a law enforcement
375 officer with a copy of the petition, financial affidavit,
Page 15 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
376 Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act
377 affidavit, if any, notice of final hearing, and temporary
378 injunction, if any, before prior to the final hearing.
379 (5)(a) Upon review of the petition, if it appears to the
380 court that an immediate and present danger of domestic violence
381 exists, the court may grant a temporary injunction ex parte,
382 pending a final full hearing, and may grant such relief as the
383 court deems proper, including an injunction:
384 1. Restraining the respondent from committing any acts of
385 domestic violence.
386 2. Awarding to the petitioner the temporary exclusive use
387 and possession of the dwelling that the parties share or
388 excluding the respondent from the residence of the petitioner.
389 3. On the same basis as provided in s. 61.13, providing
390 the petitioner a temporary parenting plan, including a time-
391 sharing schedule, which may award the petitioner up to 100
392 percent of the time-sharing. If temporary time-sharing is
393 awarded to the respondent, the exchange of the child must occur
394 at a neutral safe exchange location as provided in s. 125.01(8)
395 or a location authorized by a supervised visitation program as
396 defined in s. 753.01 if the court determines it is in the best
397 interests of the child after consideration of all of the factors
398 specified in s. 61.13(3). The temporary parenting plan remains
399 in effect until the order expires or an order is entered by a
400 court of competent jurisdiction in a pending or subsequent civil
Page 16 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
401 action or proceeding affecting the placement of, access to,
402 parental time with, adoption of, or parental rights and
403 responsibilities for the minor child.
404 4. If the petitioner and respondent have an existing
405 parenting plan or time-sharing schedule under another court
406 order, designating that the exchange of the minor child or
407 children of the parties must occur at a neutral safe exchange
408 location as provided in s. 125.01(8) or a location authorized by
409 a supervised visitation program as defined in s. 753.01 if the
410 court determines it is in the best interests of the child after
411 consideration of all of the factors specified in s. 61.13(3).
412 5. Awarding to the petitioner the temporary exclusive
413 care, possession, or control of an animal that is owned,
414 possessed, harbored, kept, or held by the petitioner, the
415 respondent, or a minor child residing in the residence or
416 household of the petitioner or respondent. The court may order
417 the respondent to temporarily have no contact with the animal
418 and prohibit the respondent from taking, transferring,
419 encumbering, concealing, harming, or otherwise disposing of the
420 animal. This subparagraph does not apply to an animal owned
421 primarily for a bona fide agricultural purpose, as defined under
422 s. 193.461, or to a service animal, as defined under s. 413.08,
423 if the respondent is the service animal's handler.
424 (b) Except as provided in s. 90.204, in an ex parte review
425 or an a hearing ex parte hearing for the purpose of obtaining
Page 17 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
426 such ex parte temporary injunction, no evidence other than
427 verified pleadings or affidavits shall be used as evidence,
428 unless the respondent appears at the hearing or has received
429 reasonable notice of the hearing. A denial of a petition for an
430 ex parte temporary injunction shall be by written order noting
431 the legal grounds for denial. When the only ground for denial is
432 no appearance of an immediate and present danger of domestic
433 violence, the court shall set a final full hearing on the
434 petition for injunction with notice at the earliest possible
435 time. Nothing herein affects a petitioner's right to promptly
436 amend any petition, or otherwise be heard in person on any
437 petition consistent with the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure.
438 (c) Any such ex parte temporary injunction shall be
439 effective for a fixed period not to exceed 15 days. A final full
440 hearing, as provided by this section, shall be set for a date no
441 later than the date when the temporary injunction ceases to be
442 effective. The court may grant a continuance of the hearing
443 before or during a hearing for good cause shown by any party,
444 which shall include a continuance to obtain service of process.
445 Any injunction shall be extended if necessary to remain in full
446 force and effect during any period of continuance.
447 (6)(a) Upon notice and final hearing, when it appears to
448 the court that the petitioner is either the victim of domestic
449 violence as defined by s. 741.28 or has reasonable cause to
450 believe he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a victim of
Page 18 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
451 domestic violence, the court may grant such relief as the court
452 deems proper, including an injunction:
453 1. Restraining the respondent from committing any acts of
454 domestic violence.
455 2. Awarding to the petitioner the exclusive use and
456 possession of the dwelling that the parties share or excluding
457 the respondent from the residence of the petitioner.
458 3. On the same basis as provided in chapter 61, providing
459 the petitioner with 100 percent of the time-sharing in a
460 temporary parenting plan that remains in effect until the order
461 expires or an order is entered by a court of competent
462 jurisdiction in a pending or subsequent civil action or
463 proceeding affecting the placement of, access to, parental time
464 with, adoption of, or parental rights and responsibilities for
465 the minor child.
466 4. If the petitioner and respondent have an existing
467 parenting plan or time-sharing schedule under another court
468 order, designating that the exchange of the minor child or
469 children of the parties must occur at a neutral safe exchange
470 location as provided in s. 125.01(8) or a location authorized by
471 a supervised visitation program as defined in s. 753.01 if the
472 court determines it is in the best interests of the child after
473 consideration of all of the factors specified in s. 61.13(3).
474 5. On the same basis as provided in chapter 61,
475 establishing temporary support for a minor child or children or
Page 19 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
476 the petitioner. An order of temporary support remains in effect
477 until the order expires or an order is entered by a court of
478 competent jurisdiction in a pending or subsequent civil action
479 or proceeding affecting child support.
480 6. Ordering the respondent to participate in treatment,
481 intervention, or counseling services to be paid for by the
482 respondent. When the court orders the respondent to participate
483 in a batterers' intervention program, the court, or any entity
484 designated by the court, must provide the respondent with a list
485 of batterers' intervention programs from which the respondent
486 must choose a program in which to participate.
487 7. Referring a petitioner to a certified domestic violence
488 center. The court must provide the petitioner with a list of
489 certified domestic violence centers in the circuit which the
490 petitioner may contact.
491 8. Awarding to the petitioner the exclusive care,
492 possession, or control of an animal that is owned, possessed,
493 harbored, kept, or held by the petitioner, the respondent, or a
494 minor child residing in the residence or household of the
495 petitioner or respondent. The court may order the respondent to
496 have no contact with the animal and prohibit the respondent from
497 taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, harming, or
498 otherwise disposing of the animal. This subparagraph does not
499 apply to an animal owned primarily for a bona fide agricultural
500 purpose, as defined under s. 193.461, or to a service animal, as
Page 20 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
501 defined under s. 413.08, if the respondent is the service
502 animal's handler.
503 9. Ordering such other relief as the court deems necessary
504 for the protection of a victim of domestic violence, including
505 injunctions or directives to law enforcement agencies, as
506 provided in this section.
507 (b) In determining whether a petitioner has reasonable
508 cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a
509 victim of domestic violence, the court shall consider and
510 evaluate all relevant factors alleged in the petition,
511 including, but not limited to:
512 1. The history between the petitioner and the respondent,
513 including threats, harassment, stalking, strangulation, or other
514 and physical abuse.
515 2. Whether the respondent has attempted to harm the
516 petitioner or family members or individuals closely associated
517 with the petitioner.
518 3. Whether the respondent has threatened to conceal,
519 kidnap, or harm the petitioner's child or children.
520 4. Whether the respondent has intentionally injured or
521 killed a family pet.
522 5. Whether the respondent has used, or has threatened to
523 use, against the petitioner any weapons such as guns or knives.
524 6. Whether the respondent has physically restrained the
525 petitioner from leaving the home or calling law enforcement.
Page 21 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
526 7. Whether the respondent has a criminal history involving
527 violence or the threat of violence.
528 8. The existence of a verifiable order of protection
529 issued previously or from another jurisdiction.
530 9. Whether the respondent has destroyed personal property,
531 including, but not limited to, telephones or other
532 communications equipment, clothing, or other items belonging to
533 the petitioner.
534 10. Whether the respondent has or had engaged in a pattern
535 of abusive, threatening, intimidating, or controlling behavior
536 composed of a series of acts over a period of time, however
537 short, which evidences a continuity of purpose and which
538 reasonably causes the petitioner to believe that the petitioner
539 or his or her minor child or children are in imminent danger of
540 becoming victims of any act of domestic violence.
541 11. Whether the respondent engaged in any other behavior
542 or conduct that leads the petitioner to have reasonable cause to
543 believe that he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a
544 victim of domestic violence.
545
546 In making its determination under this paragraph, the court is
547 not limited to those factors enumerated in subparagraphs 1.-11.
548 (c) The terms of an injunction restraining the respondent
549 under subparagraph (a)1. or ordering other relief for the
550 protection of the victim under subparagraph (a)9. shall remain
Page 22 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
551 in effect until modified or dissolved. Either party may move at
552 any time to modify or dissolve the injunction. No specific
553 allegations are required. Such relief may be granted in addition
554 to other civil or criminal remedies.
555 (d) A temporary or final judgment on injunction for
556 protection against domestic violence entered under this section
557 shall, on its face, indicate that:
558 1. The injunction is valid and enforceable in all counties
559 of the State of Florida.
560 2. Law enforcement officers may use their arrest powers
561 under s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the injunction.
562 3. The court had jurisdiction over the parties and matter
563 under the laws of Florida and that reasonable notice and
564 opportunity to be heard was given to the person against whom the
565 order is sought sufficient to protect that person's right to due
566 process.
567 4. The date the respondent was served with the temporary
568 or final order, if obtainable.
569 (e) An injunction for protection against domestic violence
570 entered under this section, on its face, may order that the
571 respondent attend a batterers' intervention program as a
572 condition of the injunction. Unless the court makes written
573 factual findings in its judgment or order which are based on
574 substantial evidence, stating why batterers' intervention
575 programs would be inappropriate, the court shall order the
Page 23 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
576 respondent to attend a batterers' intervention program if:
577 1. It finds that the respondent willfully violated the
578 temporary ex parte injunction;
579 2. The respondent, in this state or any other state, has
580 been convicted of, had adjudication withheld on, or pled nolo
581 contendere to a crime involving violence or a threat of
582 violence; or
583 3. The respondent, in this state or any other state, has
584 had at any time a prior injunction for protection entered
585 against the respondent after a hearing with notice.
586 (f) The fact that a separate order of protection is
587 granted to each opposing party is not legally sufficient to deny
588 any remedy to either party or to prove that the parties are
589 equally at fault or equally endangered.
590 (g) A final judgment on injunction for protection against
591 domestic violence entered under this section must, on its face,
592 indicate that it is a violation of s. 790.233, and a first
593 degree misdemeanor, for the respondent to have in his or her
594 care, custody, possession, or control any firearm or ammunition.
595 (h) All proceedings under this subsection shall be
596 recorded. Recording may be by electronic means as provided by
597 the Rules of General Practice and Judicial Administration.
598 (7) The court shall allow an advocate from a state
599 attorney's office, an advocate from a law enforcement agency, or
600 an advocate from a certified domestic violence center who is
Page 24 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
601 registered under s. 39.905 to be present with the petitioner or
602 respondent during any court proceedings or hearings related to
603 the injunction for protection, provided the petitioner or
604 respondent has made such a request and the advocate is able to
605 be present.
606 (8)(a)1. Within 24 hours after the court sets the case for
607 a final hearing issues an injunction for protection against
608 domestic violence, the clerk of the court shall electronically
609 transmit a copy of the petition, designation of mailing and e-
610 mail addresses for service, financial affidavit, Uniform Child
611 Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act affidavit, if any,
612 notice of hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, to the
613 sheriff or a law enforcement agency of the county where the
614 respondent resides or can be found, who shall serve it upon the
615 respondent as soon thereafter as possible on any day of the week
616 and at any time of the day or night. The respondent shall file a
617 designation of mailing and e-mail addresses with the clerk of
618 the court for subsequent service within 1 business day after the
619 respondent has been personally served. An electronic copy of the
620 temporary an injunction must be certified by the clerk of the
621 court, and the electronic copy must be served in the same manner
622 as a certified copy. Upon receiving an electronic copy of the
623 temporary injunction, the sheriff must verify receipt with the
624 sender before attempting to serve it upon the respondent. In
625 addition, if the sheriff is in possession of a temporary an
Page 25 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
626 injunction for protection that has been certified by the clerk
627 of the court, the sheriff may electronically transmit a copy of
628 that temporary injunction to a law enforcement officer who shall
629 serve it in the same manner as a certified copy. The clerk of
630 the court is responsible for furnishing to the sheriff such
631 information on the respondent's physical description and
632 location as is required by the department to comply with the
633 verification procedures set forth in this section.
634 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the chief judge
635 of each circuit, in consultation with the appropriate sheriff,
636 may authorize a law enforcement agency within the jurisdiction
637 to effect service. A law enforcement agency serving injunctions
638 pursuant to this section must use service and verification
639 procedures consistent with those of the sheriff.
640 2. When an injunction is issued, if the petitioner
641 requests the assistance of a law enforcement agency, the court
642 may order that an officer from the appropriate law enforcement
643 agency accompany the petitioner and assist in placing the
644 petitioner in possession of the dwelling or residence, or
645 otherwise assist in the execution or service of the temporary or
646 final injunction. A law enforcement officer must accept a copy
647 of the temporary or final an injunction for protection against
648 domestic violence, certified by the clerk of the court, from the
649 petitioner and immediately serve it upon a respondent who has
650 been located but not yet served.
Page 26 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
651 3. All orders issued, changed, continued, extended, or
652 vacated subsequent to the original service of documents
653 enumerated under subparagraph 1. must be certified by the clerk
654 of the court and delivered to the parties at the time of the
655 entry of the subsequent order, if a party is physically present
656 before the court. The parties may acknowledge receipt of such
657 order in writing on the face of the original order. If In the
658 event a party fails or refuses to acknowledge the receipt of a
659 certified copy of an order, the clerk shall note on the original
660 order that service was effected. If delivery at the hearing is
661 not possible or the parties have appeared through audio-video
662 communication technology, the clerk must shall mail or e-mail
663 certified copies of the order to the parties at the last known
664 physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by mail or e-
665 mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order is
666 served by the clerk of the court pursuant to this subsection,
667 the clerk shall prepare a written certification to be placed in
668 the court file specifying the time, date, and method of service
669 and shall notify the sheriff.
670
671 If the respondent has been served by a law enforcement officer
672 previously with the temporary injunction or a notice of hearing
673 on a and has failed to appear at the initial hearing on the
674 temporary injunction, any subsequent petition for injunction
675 seeking an extension of time, any subsequent temporary or final
Page 27 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
676 injunction, or any subsequent order may be served on the
677 respondent by the clerk of the court by certified mail or e-mail
678 in lieu of personal service by a law enforcement officer.
679 (b) A Domestic and Repeat Violence Injunction Statewide
680 Injunction Verification System is created within the Department
681 of Law Enforcement. The department shall establish, implement,
682 and maintain a statewide communication system capable of
683 electronically transmitting information to and between criminal
684 justice agencies relating to domestic violence injunctions,
685 dating violence injunctions, sexual violence injunctions, and
686 repeat violence injunctions, and stalking injunctions issued by
687 the courts throughout the state. Such information must include,
688 but is not limited to, information as to the existence and
689 status of any injunction for verification purposes.
690 (c)1. Within 24 hours after the court issues a temporary
691 an injunction for protection against domestic violence or
692 changes, continues, extends, or vacates an injunction for
693 protection against domestic violence, the clerk of the court
694 must electronically transmit a certified copy of the injunction
695 for service to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the residence
696 of the petitioner. The injunction must be served in accordance
697 with this subsection.
698 2. Within 24 hours after service of process of an
699 injunction for protection against domestic violence upon a
700 respondent, the law enforcement officer must electronically
Page 28 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
701 transmit the written proof of service of process to the sheriff
702 with jurisdiction over the residence of the petitioner.
703 3. Within 24 hours after the sheriff receives a certified
704 copy of the injunction for protection against domestic violence,
705 the sheriff must make information relating to the injunction
706 available to other law enforcement agencies by electronically
707 transmitting such information to the department.
708 4. Within 24 hours after the sheriff or other law
709 enforcement officer has made service upon the respondent and the
710 sheriff has been so notified, the sheriff must make information
711 relating to the service available to other law enforcement
712 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to the
713 department.
714 5. Within 24 hours after the court issues a final
715 injunction for protection after a hearing or changes, continues,
716 extends, or vacates an injunction for protection against
717 domestic violence, the clerk must mail or e-mail certified
718 copies of the injunction order to the last known physical or e-
719 mail address of each party. Service by mail or e-mail is
720 complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order is served
721 pursuant to this subsection by the clerk of the court, the clerk
722 shall prepare a written certification to be placed in the court
723 file specifying the time, date, and method of service. The clerk
724 of the court must electronically transmit a certified copy of
725 the injunction to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the
Page 29 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
726 residence of the petitioner. Within 24 hours after the sheriff
727 receives a certified copy of the injunction for protection
728 against domestic violence under this subsection, the sheriff
729 must make information relating to the injunction available to
730 other law enforcement agencies by electronically transmitting
731 such information to the department.
732 6. Subject to available funding, the Florida Association
733 of Court Clerks and Comptrollers shall develop an automated
734 process by which a petitioner may request notification of
735 service of the injunction for protection against domestic
736 violence and other court actions related to the injunction for
737 protection. The automated notice must be made within 12 hours
738 after the sheriff or other law enforcement officer serves the
739 injunction upon the respondent. The notification must include,
740 at a minimum, the date, time, and location where the injunction
741 for protection against domestic violence was served. The Florida
742 Association of Court Clerks and Comptrollers may apply for any
743 available grants to fund the development of the automated
744 process.
745 7.6. Within 24 hours after an injunction for protection
746 against domestic violence is vacated, terminated, or otherwise
747 rendered no longer effective by ruling of the court, the clerk
748 of the court must notify the sheriff receiving original
749 notification of the injunction as provided in subparagraph 2.
750 That agency shall, within 24 hours after receiving such
Page 30 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
751 notification from the clerk of the court, notify the department
752 of such action of the court.
753 (d) The petitioner may request a Hope Card under s.
754 741.311 after the court has issued a final injunction order of
755 protection.
756 (9)(a) The court may enforce a violation of an injunction
757 for protection against domestic violence through a civil or
758 criminal contempt proceeding, or the state attorney may
759 prosecute it as a criminal violation under s. 741.31. The court
760 may enforce the respondent's compliance with the injunction
761 through any appropriate civil and criminal remedies, including,
762 but not limited to, a monetary assessment or a fine. The clerk
763 of the court shall collect and receive such assessments or
764 fines. On a monthly basis, the clerk shall transfer the moneys
765 collected pursuant to this paragraph to the State Treasury for
766 deposit in the Domestic Violence Trust Fund established in s.
767 741.01.
768 (b) If the respondent is arrested by a law enforcement
769 officer under s. 901.15(6) or for a violation of s. 741.31, the
770 respondent shall be held in custody until brought before the
771 court as expeditiously as possible for the purpose of enforcing
772 the injunction and for admittance to bail in accordance with
773 chapter 903 and the applicable rules of criminal procedure,
774 pending a hearing.
775 (10) The petitioner or the respondent may move the court
Page 31 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
776 to modify or dissolve an injunction at any time.
777 Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3), paragraph (b)
778 of subsection (4), and subsections (5) through (9) of section
779 784.046, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph (f) is
780 added to subsection (2) of that section, to read:
781 784.046 Action by victim of repeat violence, sexual
782 violence, or dating violence for protective injunction; dating
783 violence investigations, notice to victims, and reporting;
784 pretrial release violations; public records exemption.—
785 (2) There is created a cause of action for an injunction
786 for protection in cases of repeat violence, there is created a
787 separate cause of action for an injunction for protection in
788 cases of dating violence, and there is created a separate cause
789 of action for an injunction for protection in cases of sexual
790 violence.
791 (f) The court is prohibited from issuing mutual orders of
792 protection. This does not preclude the court from issuing
793 separate injunctions for protection against repeat violence,
794 sexual violence, or dating violence if each party has complied
795 with this section. Compliance with this section may not be
796 waived.
797 (3)(a) The clerk of the court shall provide a copy of this
798 section, simplified forms for the injunction, a designation of
799 mailing and e-mail addresses for service, and clerical
800 assistance for the preparation and filing of such a petition by
Page 32 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
801 any person who is not represented by counsel.
802 (4)
803 (b) The verified petition must be in substantially the
804 following form:
805
806 PETITION FOR INJUNCTION FOR PROTECTION
807 AGAINST REPEAT VIOLENCE, SEXUAL
808 VIOLENCE, OR DATING VIOLENCE
809
810 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under
811 penalties of perjury that the following statements are true:
812
813 1. Petitioner resides at ...(address)... (A petitioner for
814 an injunction for protection against repeat violence, sexual
815 violence, or dating violence may furnish an address to the court
816 in a separate confidential filing if, for safety reasons, the
817 petitioner requires the location of his or her current residence
818 to be confidential pursuant to s. 119.071(2)(j), Florida
819 Statutes.)
820 2. Respondent resides at ...(address)....
821 3.a. Petitioner has suffered repeat violence as
822 demonstrated by the fact that the respondent has: ...(enumerate
823 incidents of violence)...
824 ................................................................
825 ................................................................
Page 33 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
826 ................................................................
827 b. Petitioner has suffered sexual violence as demonstrated
828 by the fact that the respondent has: ...(enumerate incident of
829 violence and include incident report number from law enforcement
830 agency or attach notice of inmate release)...
831 ................................................................
832 ................................................................
833 ................................................................
834 c. Petitioner is a victim of dating violence and has
835 reasonable cause to believe that he or she is in imminent danger
836 of becoming the victim of another act of dating violence or has
837 reasonable cause to believe that he or she is in imminent danger
838 of becoming a victim of dating violence, as demonstrated by the
839 fact that the respondent has: ...(list the specific incident or
840 incidents of violence and describe the length of time of the
841 relationship, whether it has been in existence during the last 6
842 months, the nature of the relationship of a romantic or intimate
843 nature, the frequency and type of interaction, and any other
844 facts that characterize the relationship)...
845 ................................................................
846 ................................................................
847 ................................................................
Page 34 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
848 4. Petitioner genuinely fears repeat violence by the
849 respondent.
850 5. Petitioner seeks: an immediate injunction against the
851 respondent, enjoining him or her from committing any further
852 acts of violence; an injunction enjoining the respondent from
853 committing any further acts of violence; and an injunction
854 providing any terms the court deems necessary for the protection
855 of the petitioner and the petitioner's immediate family,
856 including any injunctions or directives to law enforcement
857 agencies.
858
859 (5) Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall
860 review the petition ex parte. The court must set a final hearing
861 to be held at the earliest possible time if it appears that the
862 petitioner meets the criteria of paragraph (2)(a), paragraph
863 (2)(b), or paragraph (2)(c). If a final hearing is set, the
864 respondent must shall be personally served by a law enforcement
865 officer with a copy of the petition, designation of mailing and
866 e-mail addresses, notice of final hearing, and temporary
867 injunction, if any, before prior to the final hearing.
868 (6)(a) Upon review of the petition, if When it appears to
869 the court that an immediate and present danger of violence
870 exists, the court may grant a temporary injunction ex parte
871 which may be granted in an ex parte hearing, pending a final
872 full hearing, and may grant such relief as the court deems
Page 35 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
873 proper, including an injunction enjoining the respondent from
874 committing any acts of violence.
875 (b) Except as provided in s. 90.204, in an a hearing ex
876 parte review or hearing for the purpose of obtaining such
877 temporary injunction, no evidence other than the verified
878 pleadings or affidavits may not pleading or affidavit shall be
879 used as evidence, unless the respondent appears at the hearing
880 or has received reasonable notice of the hearing. A court's
881 denial of a petition for an ex parte temporary injunction must
882 be by written order noting the legal grounds for the denial.
883 When the only grounds for denial is no appearance of an
884 immediate and present danger of violence, the court may set a
885 final hearing on the petition without issuing a temporary
886 injunction with notice at the earliest possible time. This
887 paragraph does not affect a petitioner's right to promptly
888 dismiss a petition, amend a petition, or otherwise be heard in
889 person on a petition consistent with the Florida Rules of Civil
890 Procedure.
891 (c) Any such ex parte temporary injunction shall be
892 effective for a fixed period not to exceed 15 days. However, an
893 ex parte temporary injunction granted under subparagraph
894 (2)(c)2. is effective for 15 days following the date the
895 respondent is released from incarceration. If a final A full
896 hearing is set, it must as provided by this section, shall be
897 set for a date no later than the date when the temporary
Page 36 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
898 injunction ceases to be effective. The court may grant a
899 continuance of the temporary ex parte injunction before or
900 during the final and the full hearing before or during a
901 hearing, for good cause shown by any party, which includes a
902 continuance to obtain service of process. Any injunction must be
903 extended if necessary to remain in full force and effect during
904 any period of continuance.
905 (7) Upon notice and final hearing, the court may grant
906 such relief as the court deems proper, including an injunction:
907 (a) Enjoining the respondent from committing any acts of
908 violence.
909 (b) Ordering such other relief as the court deems
910 necessary for the protection of the petitioner, including
911 injunctions or directives to law enforcement agencies, as
912 provided in this section.
913 (c) The terms of the injunction shall remain in full force
914 and effect until modified or dissolved. Either party may move at
915 any time to modify or dissolve the injunction. Such relief may
916 be granted in addition to other civil or criminal remedies.
917 (d) A temporary or final judgment on injunction for
918 protection against repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating
919 violence entered pursuant to this section shall, on its face,
920 indicate that:
921 1. The injunction is valid and enforceable in all counties
922 of the State of Florida.
Page 37 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
923 2. Law enforcement officers may use their arrest powers
924 pursuant to s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the injunction.
925 3. The court had jurisdiction over the parties and matter
926 under the laws of Florida and that reasonable notice and
927 opportunity to be heard was given to the person against whom the
928 order is sought sufficient to protect that person's right to due
929 process.
930 4. The date that the respondent was served with the
931 temporary or final order, if obtainable.
932 5. All proceedings under this paragraph must be recorded.
933 Recording may be by electronic means as provided by the Rules of
934 General Practice and Judicial Administration.
935 (8)(a)1. Within 24 hours after the court sets the case for
936 a final hearing issues an injunction for protection against
937 repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating violence, the clerk
938 of the court shall electronically transmit a copy of the
939 petition, designation of mailing and e-mail addresses for
940 service, notice of hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, to
941 the sheriff or a law enforcement agency of the county where the
942 respondent resides or can be found, who shall serve it upon the
943 respondent as soon thereafter as possible on any day of the week
944 and at any time of the day or night. The respondent shall file a
945 designation of mailing or e-mail addresses with the clerk of the
946 court for subsequent service within 1 business day after the
947 respondent has been personally served. An electronic copy of the
Page 38 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
948 temporary an injunction must be certified by the clerk of the
949 court, and the electronic copy must be served in the same manner
950 as a certified copy. Upon receiving an electronic copy of the
951 temporary injunction, the sheriff must verify receipt with the
952 sender before attempting to serve it upon the respondent. In
953 addition, if the sheriff is in possession of the temporary an
954 injunction for protection that has been certified by the clerk
955 of the court, the sheriff may electronically transmit a copy of
956 that temporary injunction to a law enforcement officer who shall
957 serve it in the same manner as a certified copy. The clerk of
958 the court is responsible for furnishing to the sheriff such
959 information on the respondent's physical description and
960 location as is required by the department to comply with the
961 verification procedures set forth in this section.
962 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the chief judge
963 of each circuit, in consultation with the appropriate sheriff,
964 may authorize a law enforcement agency within the chief judge's
965 jurisdiction to effect this type of service and to receive a
966 portion of the service fee. A person may not serve or execute a
967 temporary an injunction issued under this section unless the
968 person is a law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 943.
969 2. When an injunction is issued, if the petitioner
970 requests the assistance of a law enforcement agency, the court
971 may order that an officer from the appropriate law enforcement
972 agency accompany the petitioner and assist in the execution or
Page 39 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
973 service of the temporary or final injunction. A law enforcement
974 officer must accept a copy of the temporary or final an
975 injunction for protection against repeat violence, sexual
976 violence, or dating violence, certified by the clerk of the
977 court, from the petitioner and immediately serve it upon a
978 respondent who has been located but not yet served.
979 3. All orders issued, changed, continued, extended, or
980 vacated subsequent to the original service of documents
981 enumerated under subparagraph 1. must be certified by the clerk
982 of the court and delivered to the parties at the time of the
983 entry of the subsequent order if a party is physically present
984 before the court. The parties may acknowledge receipt of such
985 order in writing on the face of the original order. If a party
986 fails or refuses to acknowledge the receipt of a certified copy
987 of an order, the clerk must note on the original order that
988 service was effected. If delivery at the hearing is not
989 possible, or the parties have appeared through audio-video
990 communication technology, the clerk must mail or e-mail
991 certified copies of the order to the parties at the last known
992 physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by mail or e-
993 mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order is
994 served by the clerk of the court pursuant to this subsection,
995 the clerk shall prepare a written certification to be placed in
996 the court file specifying the time, date, and method of service
997 and shall notify the sheriff.
Page 40 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
998
999 If the respondent has been served by a law enforcement officer
1000 with the temporary injunction or a notice of hearing on a
1001 temporary injunction, any subsequent petition for injunction
1002 seeking an extension of time, or any subsequent temporary
1003 injunction, final injunction, or order, may be served on the
1004 respondent by the clerk of the court by certified mail or e-
1005 mail, in lieu of personal service by a law enforcement officer.
1006 (b) A Domestic, Dating, Sexual, and Repeat Violence
1007 Injunction Statewide Injunction Verification System is created
1008 within the Department of Law Enforcement. The department shall
1009 establish, implement, and maintain a statewide communication
1010 system capable of electronically transmitting information to and
1011 between criminal justice agencies relating to domestic violence
1012 injunctions, dating violence injunctions, sexual violence
1013 injunctions, and repeat violence injunctions, and stalking
1014 injunctions issued by the courts throughout the state. Such
1015 information must include, but is not limited to, information as
1016 to the existence and status of any injunction for verification
1017 purposes.
1018 (c)1. Within 24 hours after the court issues an injunction
1019 for protection against repeat violence, sexual violence, or
1020 dating violence or changes or vacates an injunction for
1021 protection against repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating
1022 violence, the clerk of the court must electronically transmit a
Page 41 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1023 copy of the injunction to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the
1024 residence of the petitioner.
1025 2. Within 24 hours after service of process of an
1026 injunction for protection against repeat violence, sexual
1027 violence, or dating violence upon a respondent, the law
1028 enforcement officer must electronically transmit the written
1029 proof of service of process to the sheriff with jurisdiction
1030 over the residence of the petitioner.
1031 3. Within 24 hours after the sheriff receives a certified
1032 copy of the injunction for protection against repeat violence,
1033 sexual violence, or dating violence, the sheriff must make
1034 information relating to the injunction available to other law
1035 enforcement agencies by electronically transmitting such
1036 information to the department.
1037 4. Within 24 hours after the sheriff or other law
1038 enforcement officer has made service upon the respondent and the
1039 sheriff has been so notified, the sheriff must make information
1040 relating to the service available to other law enforcement
1041 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to the
1042 department.
1043 5. Within 24 hours after the court issues a final
1044 injunction for protection after a hearing or changes, continues,
1045 extends, or vacates an injunction for protection against repeat,
1046 sexual, or dating violence, the clerk must mail or e-mail
1047 certified copies of the injunction order to the last known
Page 42 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1048 physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by mail or e-
1049 mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order is
1050 served pursuant to this subsection, the clerk shall prepare a
1051 written certification to be placed in the court file specifying
1052 the time, date, and method of service. The clerk of the court
1053 shall electronically transmit a certified copy of the injunction
1054 to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the residence of the
1055 petitioner. Within 24 hours after the sheriff receives a
1056 certified copy of the injunction for protection against domestic
1057 violence under this subsection, the sheriff must make
1058 information relating to the injunction available to other law
1059 enforcement agencies by electronically transmitting such
1060 information to the department.
1061 6. Subject to available funding, the Florida Association
1062 of Court Clerks and Comptrollers shall develop an automated
1063 process by which a petitioner may request notification of
1064 service of the injunction for protection against repeat
1065 violence, sexual violence, or dating violence and other court
1066 actions related to the injunction for protection. The automated
1067 notice must be made within 12 hours after the sheriff or other
1068 law enforcement officer serves the injunction upon the
1069 respondent. The notification must include, at a minimum, the
1070 date, time, and location where the injunction for protection
1071 against repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating violence was
1072 served. The Florida Association of Court Clerks and Comptrollers
Page 43 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1073 may apply for any available grants to fund the development of
1074 the automated process.
1075 7.6. Within 24 hours after an injunction for protection
1076 against repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating violence is
1077 lifted, terminated, or otherwise rendered no longer effective by
1078 ruling of the court, the clerk of the court must notify the
1079 sheriff or local law enforcement agency receiving original
1080 notification of the injunction as provided in subparagraph 2.
1081 That agency shall, within 24 hours after receiving such
1082 notification from the clerk of the court, notify the department
1083 of such action of the court.
1084 (d) The petitioner may request a Hope Card under s.
1085 741.311 after the court has issued a final injunction order of
1086 protection.
1087 (9)(a) The court shall enforce, through a civil or
1088 criminal contempt proceeding, a violation of the temporary or
1089 final an injunction for protection. The court may enforce the
1090 respondent's compliance with the injunction by imposing a
1091 monetary assessment. The clerk of the court shall collect and
1092 receive such assessments. On a monthly basis, the clerk shall
1093 transfer the moneys collected pursuant to this paragraph to the
1094 State Treasury for deposit in the Crimes Compensation Trust Fund
1095 established in s. 960.21.
1096 (b) If the respondent is arrested by a law enforcement
1097 officer under s. 901.15(6) for committing an act of repeat
Page 44 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1098 violence, sexual violence, or dating violence in violation of a
1099 temporary or final an injunction for protection, the respondent
1100 shall be held in custody until brought before the court as
1101 expeditiously as possible for the purpose of enforcing the
1102 injunction and for admittance to bail in accordance with chapter
1103 903 and the applicable rules of criminal procedure, pending a
1104 hearing.
1105 Section 3. Section 784.0485, Florida Statutes, is amended
1106 to read:
1107 784.0485 Stalking; injunction; powers and duties of court
1108 and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary injunction;
1109 issuance of injunction; Statewide Injunction Verification
1110 System; enforcement.—
1111 (1) There is created a cause of action for an injunction
1112 for protection against stalking. For the purposes of injunctions
1113 for protection against stalking under this section, the offense
1114 of stalking shall include the offense of cyberstalking.
1115 (a) A person who is the victim of stalking or the parent
1116 or legal guardian of a minor child who is living at home who
1117 seeks an injunction for protection against stalking on behalf of
1118 the minor child has standing in the circuit court to file a
1119 verified petition for an injunction for protection against
1120 stalking.
1121 (b) The cause of action for an injunction for protection
1122 may be sought regardless of whether any other cause of action is
Page 45 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1123 currently pending between the parties. However, the pendency of
1124 any such cause of action shall be alleged in the petition.
1125 (c) The cause of action for an injunction may be sought by
1126 any affected person.
1127 (d) The cause of action for an injunction does not require
1128 either party to be represented by an attorney.
1129 (e) The court may not issue mutual orders of protection;
1130 however, the court is not precluded from issuing separate
1131 injunctions for protection against stalking if each party has
1132 complied with this section. Compliance with this section may not
1133 be waived.
1134 (f) Notwithstanding chapter 47, a petition for an
1135 injunction for protection against stalking may be filed in the
1136 circuit where the petitioner currently or temporarily resides,
1137 where the respondent resides, or where the stalking occurred.
1138 There is no minimum requirement of residency to petition for an
1139 injunction for protection.
1140 (2)(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the clerk of court
1141 may not assess a filing fee to file a petition for protection
1142 against stalking. However, subject to legislative appropriation,
1143 the clerk of the circuit court may, on a quarterly basis, submit
1144 to the Justice Administrative Commission a certified request for
1145 reimbursement for petitions for protection against stalking
1146 issued by the court, at the rate of $40 per petition. The
1147 request for reimbursement must be submitted in the form and
Page 46 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1148 manner prescribed by the Justice Administrative Commission. From
1149 this reimbursement, the clerk shall pay any law enforcement
1150 agency serving the injunction the fee requested by the law
1151 enforcement agency; however, this fee may not exceed $20.
1152 (b) A bond is not required by the court for the entry of
1153 an injunction.
1154 (c)1. The clerk of the court shall assist petitioners in
1155 seeking both injunctions for protection against stalking and
1156 enforcement of a violation thereof as specified in this section.
1157 2. All offices of the clerk of the court shall provide
1158 simplified petition forms for the injunction and any
1159 modifications to and the enforcement thereof, and a designation
1160 of mailing and e-mail addresses for service, including
1161 instructions for completion.
1162 3. The clerk of the court shall ensure the petitioner's
1163 privacy to the extent practicable while completing the forms for
1164 an injunction for protection against stalking.
1165 4. The clerk of the court shall provide a petitioner with
1166 a minimum of two certified copies of the order of injunction,
1167 one of which is serviceable and will inform the petitioner of
1168 the process for service and enforcement.
1169 5. The clerk of the court and appropriate staff in each
1170 county shall receive training in the effective assistance of
1171 petitioners as provided or approved by the Florida Association
1172 of Court Clerks and Comptrollers.
Page 47 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1173 6. The clerk of the court in each county shall make
1174 available informational brochures on stalking when such a
1175 brochure is provided by the local certified domestic violence
1176 center or certified rape crisis center.
1177 7. The clerk of the court in each county shall distribute
1178 a statewide uniform informational brochure to petitioners at the
1179 time of filing for an injunction for protection against stalking
1180 when such brochures become available. The brochure must include
1181 information about the effect of giving the court false
1182 information.
1183 (3)(a) The verified petition shall allege the existence of
1184 such stalking and shall include the specific facts and
1185 circumstances for which relief is sought.
1186 (b) The verified petition shall be in substantially the
1187 following form:
1188
1189 PETITION FOR INJUNCTION
1190 FOR PROTECTION AGAINST STALKING
1191
1192 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under
1193 penalties of perjury that the following statements are
1194 true:
1195
1196 1. Petitioner resides at: ...(address)...
1197 (Petitioner may furnish the address to the court in a
Page 48 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1198 separate confidential filing if, for safety reasons,
1199 the petitioner requires the location of the current
1200 residence to be confidential.)
1201 2. Respondent resides at: ...(last known address)...
1202 3. Respondent's last known place of employment:
1203 ...(name of business and address)...
1204 4. Physical description of respondent: ....
1205 5. Race: ....
1206 6. Sex: ....
1207 7. Date of birth: ....
1208 8. Height: ....
1209 9. Weight: ....
1210 10. Eye color: ....
1211 11. Hair color: ....
1212 12. Distinguishing marks or scars: ....
1213 13. Aliases of respondent: ....
1214
1215 (c) The petitioner shall describe any other cause of
1216 action currently pending between the petitioner and respondent.
1217 The petitioner shall also describe any previous attempt by the
1218 petitioner to obtain an injunction for protection against
1219 stalking in this or any other circuit, and the result of that
1220 attempt. (Case numbers should be included, if available.)
1221 (d) The petition must provide space for the petitioner to
1222 specifically allege that he or she is a victim of stalking
Page 49 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1223 because respondent has:
1224
1225 (Mark all sections that apply and describe in the
1226 spaces below the incidents of stalking specifying when
1227 and where they occurred, including, but not limited
1228 to, locations such as a home, school, or place of
1229 employment.)
1230
1231 .... Committed stalking.
1232 .... Previously threatened, harassed, stalked,
1233 cyberstalked, or physically abused the petitioner.
1234 .... Threatened to harm the petitioner or family members or
1235 individuals closely associated with the petitioner.
1236 .... Intentionally injured or killed a family pet.
1237 .... Used, or threatened to use, against the petitioner any
1238 weapons such as guns or knives.
1239 .... A criminal history involving violence or the threat of
1240 violence, if known.
1241 .... Another order of protection issued against him or her
1242 previously or from another jurisdiction, if known.
1243 .... Destroyed personal property, including, but not
1244 limited to, telephones or other communication equipment,
1245 clothing, or other items belonging to the petitioner.
1246
1247 (e) The petitioner seeks an injunction:
Page 50 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1248
1249 (Mark appropriate section or sections.)
1250
1251 .... Immediately restraining the respondent from committing
1252 any acts of stalking.
1253 .... Restraining the respondent from committing any acts of
1254 stalking.
1255 .... Providing any terms the court deems necessary for the
1256 protection of a victim of stalking, including any injunctions or
1257 directives to law enforcement agencies.
1258
1259 (f) Every petition for an injunction against stalking must
1260 contain, directly above the signature line, a statement in all
1261 capital letters and bold type not smaller than the surrounding
1262 text, as follows:
1263
1264 UNDER PENALTIES OF PERJURY, I DECLARE THAT I HAVE READ
1265 THE FOREGOING DOCUMENT AND THAT THE FACTS STATED IN IT
1266 ARE TRUE. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE STATEMENTS MADE IN
1267 THIS PETITION ARE BEING MADE UNDER PENALTIES OF
1268 PERJURY, PUNISHABLE AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 92.525,
1269 FLORIDA STATUTES.
1270
1271 ...(initials)...
1272
Page 51 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1273 (4) Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall
1274 review the petition ex parte. The court must set a final hearing
1275 to be held at the earliest possible time if it appears that the
1276 petitioner is a victim of stalking. If a final hearing is set,
1277 the respondent must shall be personally served by a law
1278 enforcement officer with a copy of the petition, notice of
1279 hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, before the final
1280 hearing.
1281 (5)(a) Upon review of the petition, if it appears to the
1282 court that stalking exists, the court may grant a temporary
1283 injunction ex parte, pending a final full hearing, and may grant
1284 such relief as the court deems proper, including an injunction
1285 restraining the respondent from committing any act of stalking.
1286 (b) Except as provided in s. 90.204, in an ex parte review
1287 or an a hearing ex parte hearing for the purpose of obtaining
1288 such ex parte temporary injunction, evidence other than verified
1289 pleadings or affidavits may not be used as evidence, unless the
1290 respondent appears at the hearing or has received reasonable
1291 notice of the hearing. A denial of a petition for an ex parte
1292 temporary injunction shall be by written order noting the legal
1293 grounds for denial. If the only ground for denial is no
1294 appearance of an immediate and present danger of stalking, the
1295 court shall set a final full hearing on the petition for
1296 injunction with notice at the earliest possible time. This
1297 paragraph does not affect a petitioner's right to promptly amend
Page 52 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1298 any petition, or otherwise be heard in person on any petition
1299 consistent with the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure.
1300 (c) Any such ex parte temporary injunction is effective
1301 for a fixed period not to exceed 15 days. If a final full
1302 hearing is set, as provided in this section, the hearing shall
1303 be set for a date no later than the date when the temporary
1304 injunction ceases to be effective. The court may grant a
1305 continuance of the hearing before or during the final a hearing
1306 for good cause shown by any party, which shall include a
1307 continuance to obtain service of process. An injunction shall be
1308 extended if necessary to remain in full force and effect during
1309 any period of continuance.
1310 (6)(a) Upon notice and final hearing, when it appears to
1311 the court that the petitioner is the victim of stalking, the
1312 court may grant such relief as the court deems proper, including
1313 an injunction:
1314 1. Restraining the respondent from committing any act of
1315 stalking.
1316 2. Ordering the respondent to participate in treatment,
1317 intervention, or counseling services to be paid for by the
1318 respondent.
1319 3. Referring a petitioner to appropriate services. The
1320 court may provide the petitioner with a list of certified
1321 domestic violence centers, certified rape crisis centers, and
1322 other appropriate referrals in the circuit which the petitioner
Page 53 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1323 may contact.
1324 4. Ordering such other relief as the court deems necessary
1325 for the protection of a victim of stalking, including
1326 injunctions or directives to law enforcement agencies, as
1327 provided in this section.
1328 (b) The terms of an injunction restraining the respondent
1329 under subparagraph (a)1. or ordering other relief for the
1330 protection of the victim under subparagraph (a)4. shall remain
1331 in effect until modified or dissolved. Either party may move at
1332 any time to modify or dissolve the injunction. Specific
1333 allegations are not required. Such relief may be granted in
1334 addition to other civil or criminal remedies.
1335 (c) A temporary or final judgment on injunction for
1336 protection against stalking entered pursuant to this section
1337 shall, on its face, indicate:
1338 1. That the injunction is valid and enforceable in all
1339 counties of this state.
1340 2. That law enforcement officers may use their arrest
1341 powers pursuant to s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the
1342 injunction.
1343 3. That the court has jurisdiction over the parties and
1344 matter under the laws of this state and that reasonable notice
1345 and opportunity to be heard was given to the person against whom
1346 the order is sought sufficient to protect that person's right to
1347 due process.
Page 54 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1348 4. The date that the respondent was served with the
1349 temporary or final injunction order, if obtainable.
1350 (d) The fact that a separate injunction order of
1351 protection is granted to each opposing party is not legally
1352 sufficient to deny any remedy to either party or to prove that
1353 the parties are equally at fault or equally endangered.
1354 (e) A final judgment on an injunction for protection
1355 against stalking entered pursuant to this section must, on its
1356 face, provide that it is a violation of s. 790.233 and a
1357 misdemeanor of the first degree for the respondent to have in
1358 his or her care, custody, possession, or control any firearm or
1359 ammunition.
1360 (f) All proceedings under this subsection shall be
1361 recorded. Recording may be by electronic means as provided by
1362 the Rules of General Practice and Judicial Administration.
1363 (7) The court shall allow an advocate from a state
1364 attorney's office, a law enforcement agency, a certified rape
1365 crisis center, or a certified domestic violence center who is
1366 registered under s. 39.905 to be present with the petitioner or
1367 respondent during any court proceedings or hearings related to
1368 the injunction for protection if the petitioner or respondent
1369 has made such a request and the advocate is able to be present.
1370 (8)(a)1. Within 24 hours after the court sets the case for
1371 a final hearing issues an injunction for protection against
1372 stalking, the clerk of the court shall electronically transmit a
Page 55 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1373 copy of the petition, designation of mailing and e-mail
1374 addresses, notice of hearing, and temporary injunction, if any,
1375 to the sheriff or a law enforcement agency of the county where
1376 the respondent resides or can be found, who shall serve it upon
1377 the respondent as soon thereafter as possible on any day of the
1378 week and at any time of the day or night. The respondent shall
1379 file a designation of mailing or e-mail addresses with the clerk
1380 of the court for subsequent service within 1 business day after
1381 the respondent has been personally served. An electronic copy of
1382 the temporary an injunction must be certified by the clerk of
1383 the court, and the electronic copy must be served in the same
1384 manner as a certified copy. Upon receiving an electronic copy of
1385 the temporary injunction, the sheriff must verify receipt with
1386 the sender before attempting to serve it on the respondent. In
1387 addition, if the sheriff is in possession of a temporary an
1388 injunction for protection that has been certified by the clerk
1389 of the court, the sheriff may electronically transmit a copy of
1390 that temporary injunction to a law enforcement officer who shall
1391 serve it in the same manner as a certified copy. The clerk of
1392 the court shall furnish to the sheriff such information
1393 concerning the respondent's physical description and location as
1394 is required by the Department of Law Enforcement to comply with
1395 the verification procedures set forth in this section.
1396 Notwithstanding any other law, the chief judge of each circuit,
1397 in consultation with the appropriate sheriff, may authorize a
Page 56 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1398 law enforcement agency within the jurisdiction to effect
1399 service. A law enforcement agency serving injunctions pursuant
1400 to this section must use service and verification procedures
1401 consistent with those of the sheriff.
1402 2. If an injunction is issued and the petitioner requests
1403 the assistance of a law enforcement agency, the court may order
1404 that an officer from the appropriate law enforcement agency
1405 accompany the petitioner to assist in the execution or service
1406 of the temporary or final injunction. A law enforcement officer
1407 must accept a copy of a temporary or final an injunction for
1408 protection against stalking, certified by the clerk of the
1409 court, from the petitioner and immediately serve it upon a
1410 respondent who has been located but not yet served.
1411 3. An order issued, changed, continued, extended, or
1412 vacated subsequent to the original service of documents
1413 enumerated under subparagraph 1. must be certified by the clerk
1414 of the court and delivered to the parties at the time of the
1415 entry of the subsequent order if a party is physically present
1416 before the court. The parties may acknowledge receipt of such
1417 order in writing on the face of the original order. In the event
1418 If a party fails or refuses to acknowledge the receipt of a
1419 certified copy of an order, the clerk must shall note on the
1420 original order that service was effected. If delivery at the
1421 hearing is not possible, or the parties have appeared through
1422 audio-video communication technology, the clerk must shall mail
Page 57 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1423 or e-mail certified copies of the order to the parties at the
1424 last known physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by
1425 mail or e-mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an
1426 order is served by the clerk of the court pursuant to this
1427 subsection, the clerk shall prepare a written certification to
1428 be placed in the court file specifying the time, date, and
1429 method of service and shall notify the sheriff.
1430 4. If the respondent has been served by a law enforcement
1431 officer previously with the a temporary injunction or a notice
1432 of hearing on a and has failed to appear at the initial hearing
1433 on the temporary injunction, any subsequent petition for
1434 injunction seeking an extension of time and any subsequent
1435 temporary injunction, final injunction, or order may be served
1436 on the respondent by the clerk of the court by certified mail or
1437 e-mail in lieu of personal service by a law enforcement officer.
1438 5. A Statewide Injunction Verification System is created
1439 within the Department of Law Enforcement. The department shall
1440 establish, implement, and maintain a statewide communication
1441 system capable of electronically transmitting information to and
1442 between criminal justice agencies relating to domestic violence
1443 injunctions, dating violence injunctions, sexual violence
1444 injunctions, repeat violence injunctions, and stalking
1445 injunctions issued by the courts throughout this state. Such
1446 information must include, but is not limited to, information as
1447 to the existence and status of any injunction for verification
Page 58 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1448 purposes.
1449 (b)1. Subsequent to the original service of documents in
1450 subparagraph (a)1., the clerk of the court, within 24 hours
1451 after the court issues a final an injunction for protection
1452 against stalking or changes, continues, extends, or vacates a
1453 temporary an injunction for protection against stalking, the
1454 clerk of the court must electronically transmit a certified copy
1455 of the injunction for service to the sheriff having jurisdiction
1456 over the residence of the petitioner. The clerk must mail or e-
1457 mail certified copies of the order to the parties to the last
1458 known physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by mail
1459 or e-mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order
1460 is served pursuant to this subsection, the clerk shall prepare a
1461 written certification to be placed in the court file specifying
1462 the time, date, and method of service and shall electronically
1463 transmit a certified copy of the order to the sheriff with
1464 jurisdiction over the residence of the petitioner The injunction
1465 must be served in accordance with this subsection.
1466 2. Within 24 hours after service of process of an
1467 injunction for protection against stalking upon a respondent,
1468 the law enforcement officer must electronically transmit the
1469 written proof of service of process to the sheriff having
1470 jurisdiction over the residence of the petitioner.
1471 3. Within 24 hours after the sheriff receives a certified
1472 copy of the injunction for protection against stalking, the
Page 59 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1473 sheriff must make information relating to the injunction
1474 available to other law enforcement agencies by electronically
1475 transmitting such information to the Department of Law
1476 Enforcement.
1477 4. Within 24 hours after the sheriff or other law
1478 enforcement officer has made service upon the respondent and the
1479 sheriff has been so notified, the sheriff must make information
1480 relating to the service available to other law enforcement
1481 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to the
1482 Department of Law Enforcement.
1483 5. Within 24 hours after the court issues a final
1484 injunction for protection after a hearing or changes, continues,
1485 extends, or vacates an injunction for protection against
1486 stalking is vacated, terminated, or otherwise rendered no longer
1487 effective by ruling of the court, the clerk of the court must
1488 mail or e-mail certified copies of the injunction order to the
1489 last known physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by
1490 mail or e-mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an
1491 order is served pursuant to this subsection, the clerk shall
1492 prepare a written certification to be placed in the court file
1493 specifying the time, date, and method or service. The clerk of
1494 the court must electronically transmit a certified copy of the
1495 injunction to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the residence
1496 of the petitioner. Within 24 hours after the sheriff receives a
1497 certified copy of the injunction for protection against stalking
Page 60 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1498 under this subsection, the sheriff must make information
1499 relating to the injunction available to other law enforcement
1500 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to
1501 notify the sheriff receiving original notification of the
1502 injunction as provided in subparagraph 2. That agency shall,
1503 within 24 hours after receiving such notification from the clerk
1504 of the court, notify the Department of Law Enforcement of such
1505 action of the court.
1506 (c) The petitioner may request a Hope Card under s.
1507 741.311 after the court has issued a final injunction order of
1508 protection.
1509 (9)(a) The court may enforce a violation of a temporary or
1510 final an injunction for protection against stalking through a
1511 civil or criminal contempt proceeding, or the state attorney may
1512 prosecute it as a criminal violation under s. 784.0487. Any
1513 assessments or fines ordered by the court enforcing such an
1514 injunction shall be collected by the clerk of the court and
1515 transferred on a monthly basis to the State Treasury for deposit
1516 into the Domestic Violence Trust Fund.
1517 (b) If the respondent is arrested by a law enforcement
1518 officer under s. 901.15(6) or for a violation of s. 784.0487,
1519 the respondent shall be held in custody until brought before the
1520 court as expeditiously as possible for the purpose of enforcing
1521 the injunction and for admittance to bail in accordance with
1522 chapter 903 and the applicable rules of criminal procedure,
Page 61 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1523 pending a hearing.
1524 (10) The petitioner or the respondent may move the court
1525 to modify or dissolve an injunction at any time.
1526 Section 4. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
1527 61.1825, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1528 61.1825 State Case Registry.—
1529 (3)(a) For the purpose of this section, a family violence
1530 indicator must be placed on a record when:
1531 1. A party executes a sworn statement requesting that a
1532 family violence indicator be placed on that party's record which
1533 states that the party has reason to believe that release of
1534 information to the Federal Case Registry may result in physical
1535 or emotional harm to the party or the child; or
1536 2. A temporary or final injunction for protection against
1537 domestic violence has been granted pursuant to s. 741.30(6), an
1538 injunction for protection against domestic violence has been
1539 issued by a court of a foreign state pursuant to s. 741.315, or
1540 a temporary or final injunction for protection against repeat
1541 violence has been granted pursuant to s. 784.046; or
1542 3. The department has received information on a Title IV-D
1543 case from the Statewide Domestic, Dating, Sexual, and Repeat
1544 Violence Injunction Statewide Verification System, established
1545 pursuant to s. 784.046(8)(b), that a court has granted a party a
1546 domestic violence or repeat violence injunction.
1547 Section 5. Paragraph (e) of subsection (2) of section
Page 62 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1548 943.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1549 943.05 Criminal Justice Information Program; duties; crime
1550 reports.—
1551 (2) The program shall:
1552 (e) Establish, implement, and maintain a Statewide
1553 Domestic and Repeat Violence Injunction Statewide Verification
1554 System capable of electronically transmitting information to and
1555 between criminal justice agencies relating to domestic violence
1556 injunctions, injunctions to prevent child abuse issued under
1557 chapter 39, and repeat violence injunctions issued by the courts
1558 throughout the state. Such information must include, but is not
1559 limited to, information as to the existence and status of any
1560 such injunction for verification purposes.
1561 Section 6. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
1562 made by this act to section 741.30, Florida Statutes, in a
1563 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 39.504, Florida
1564 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
1565 39.504 Injunction; penalty.—
1566 (5) Service of process on the respondent shall be carried
1567 out pursuant to s. 741.30. The department shall deliver a copy
1568 of any injunction issued pursuant to this section to the
1569 protected party or to a parent, caregiver, or individual acting
1570 in the place of a parent who is not the respondent. Law
1571 enforcement officers may exercise their arrest powers as
1572 provided in s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the injunction.
Page 63 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1573 Section 7. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
1574 made by this act to section 741.30, Florida Statutes, in a
1575 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section
1576 44.407, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
1577 44.407 Elder-focused dispute resolution process.—
1578 (3) REFERRAL.—
1579 (b) The court may not refer a party who has a history of
1580 domestic violence or exploitation of an elderly person to
1581 eldercaring coordination unless the elder and other parties in
1582 the action consent to such referral.
1583 1. The court shall offer each party an opportunity to
1584 consult with an attorney or a domestic violence advocate before
1585 accepting consent to such referral. The court shall determine
1586 whether each party has given his or her consent freely and
1587 voluntarily.
1588 2. The court shall consider whether a party has committed
1589 an act of exploitation as defined in s. 415.102, exploitation of
1590 an elderly person or disabled adult as defined in s. 825.103(1),
1591 or domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28 against another
1592 party or any member of another party's family; engaged in a
1593 pattern of behaviors that exert power and control over another
1594 party and that may compromise another party's ability to
1595 negotiate a fair result; or engaged in behavior that leads
1596 another party to have reasonable cause to believe that he or she
1597 is in imminent danger of becoming a victim of domestic violence.
Page 64 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1598 The court shall consider and evaluate all relevant factors,
1599 including, but not limited to, the factors specified in s.
1600 741.30(6)(b).
1601 3. If a party has a history of domestic violence or
1602 exploitation of an elderly person, the court must order
1603 safeguards to protect the safety of the participants and the
1604 elder and the elder's property, including, but not limited to,
1605 adherence to all provisions of an injunction for protection or
1606 conditions of bail, probation, or a sentence arising from
1607 criminal proceedings.
1608 Section 8. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
1609 made by this act to section 741.30, Florida Statutes, in a
1610 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section
1611 61.125, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
1612 61.125 Parenting coordination.—
1613 (4) DOMESTIC VIOLENCE ISSUES.—
1614 (b) In determining whether there has been a history of
1615 domestic violence, the court shall consider whether a party has
1616 committed an act of domestic violence as defined s. 741.28, or
1617 child abuse as defined in s. 39.01, against the other party or
1618 any member of the other party's family; engaged in a pattern of
1619 behaviors that exert power and control over the other party and
1620 that may compromise the other party's ability to negotiate a
1621 fair result; or engaged in behavior that leads the other party
1622 to have reasonable cause to believe he or she is in imminent
Page 65 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1623 danger of becoming a victim of domestic violence. The court
1624 shall consider and evaluate all relevant factors, including, but
1625 not limited to, the factors listed in s. 741.30(6)(b).
1626 Section 9. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
1627 made by this act to section 741.30, Florida Statutes, in a
1628 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 741.29, Florida
1629 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
1630 741.29 Domestic violence; investigation of incidents;
1631 notice to victims of legal rights and remedies; reporting.—
1632 (1) Any law enforcement officer who investigates an
1633 alleged incident of domestic violence shall:
1634 (a) Assist the victim to obtain medical treatment if such
1635 is required as a result of the alleged incident to which the
1636 officer responds;
1637 (b) Advise the victim of such violence that there is a
1638 domestic violence center from which the victim may receive
1639 services;
1640 (c) Administer a lethality assessment consistent with the
1641 requirements established in subsection (2) if the allegation of
1642 domestic violence is against an intimate partner, regardless of
1643 whether an arrest is made; and
1644 (d) Give the victim immediate notice of the legal rights
1645 and remedies available on a standard form developed and
1646 distributed by the department. As necessary, the department
1647 shall revise the Legal Rights and Remedies Notice to Victims to
Page 66 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1105 2026
1648 include a general summary of s. 741.30 using simple English as
1649 well as Spanish, and shall distribute the notice as a model form
1650 to be used by all law enforcement agencies throughout this
1651 state. The notice must include:
1652 1. The resource listing, including telephone number, for
1653 the area domestic violence center designated by the Department
1654 of Children and Families; and
1655 2. A copy of the following statement:
1656
1657 IF YOU ARE THE VICTIM OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, you may
1658 ask the state attorney to file a criminal complaint.
1659 You also have the right to go to court and file a
1660 petition requesting an injunction for protection from
1661 domestic violence which may include, but need not be
1662 limited to, provisions which restrain the abuser from
1663 further acts of abuse; direct the abuser to leave your
1664 household; prevent the abuser from entering your
1665 residence, school, business, or place of employment;
1666 award you custody of your minor child or children; and
1667 direct the abuser to pay support to you and the minor
1668 children if the abuser has a legal obligation to do
1669 so.
1670
1671 Section 10. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 67 of 67
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1105-00